Florida, session 2026, SB1736.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 36 37 Section 1.âSection 106.041, Florida Statutes, is created to 38 read: 39 106.041âPolitical activity at public institutions of higher 40 education.â 41 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term âpublic 42 institution of higher educationâ has the same meaning as in s. 43 1004.097(2). 44 (2)âEach public institution of higher education shall make 45 reasonable and good faith efforts, through its office of public 46 policy or other designated department, to promote thoughtful and 47 engaging discussions and debates during federal, state, and 48 municipal election cycles, encouraging dialogue on a broad range 49 of political issues. 50 (3)âWhen any candidate for public office requests access to 51 participate in a discussion, debate, or related event, the 52 public institution of higher education shall provide equitable 53 access to all qualified candidates for that same office. The 54 institution may also grant access to other political figures who 55 are not currently candidates for public office but who request 56 to engage in campus discussions or events. The following persons 57 must request and obtain prior approval from the institution 58 before engaging in any on-campus conversations, debates, or 59 political activities: 60 (a)âCandidates for public office in a current election 61 cycle. 62 (b)âElected officials currently serving in office. 63 (c)âPolitical committees. 64 (d)âPolitical parties, whether major or minor. 65 (e)âLobbyists, as defined s. 11.045. 66 (f)âPolitical organizations and websites. 67 (g)âCampaign managers or staff for candidates for public 68 office. 69 (4)âCandidates for public office are strictly prohibited 70 from holding partisan voter registration events on the campus of 71 a public institution of higher education or using institution 72 property, e-mails, websites, print or broadcast media, and all 73 other communication methods of the institution for campaign 74 related activities. 75 (5)âEach public institution of higher education may 76 determine the format, timing, and structure of all political 77 discussions and debates to ensure equitable representation and 78 balanced visibility for candidates from all political parties. 79 (6)âAn organization maintaining that it is nonpartisan must 80 provide the public institution of higher education, in advance 81 of any campus activity, with a copy of its current and valid 82 registration as a third-party voter registration organization. 83 Section 2.âSection 1004.0972, Florida Statutes, is created 84 to read: 85 1004.0972âPublic institutions of higher education 86 requirements for political activities.â 87 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term âpublic 88 institution of higher educationâ has the same meaning as in s. 89 1004.097(2). 90 (2)âPursuant to s. 106.041 and state law, each public 91 institution of higher education shall establish policies for 92 political activities on the campus of the institution. Such 93 policies must: 94 (a)âAllow for voter registration drives on campus by all of 95 the following if the institution makes the campus available in a 96 fair and equal manner to each political party and candidate: 97 1.âA political party. 98 2.âA political committee. 99 3.âA candidate for public office, if such voter 100 registration drive is not partisan. 101 4.âA nonpartisan political committee, a political 102 organization, or any other partisan entity. The nonpartisan 103 political committee, political organization, or other partisan 104 entity must be approved in advance by the institution. 105 (b)âProhibit political parties, political committees, and 106 candidates for public office from campaigning, speaking, or 107 appearing on campus in any partisan political manner unless 108 equal access and time is given to each political party, and each 109 political committee and candidate running for such public office 110 appears simultaneously, or if unavailable, appears with equal 111 access and an equal timeframe at an alternative event. This 112 paragraph does not apply to a candidate engaging in a non 113 campaign related event or visiting on a personal basis. 114 (c)âProhibit registered student organizations, including, 115 but not limited to, Florida College Democrats, Florida 116 Federation of College Republicans, and all other partisan 117 political organizations, from engaging or intervening in 118 political campaigns or appearing with a candidate for public 119 office on campus, unless such event is previously registered 120 with and approved in advance by the institution. 121 (d)âMay impose additional restrictions on the number and 122 location of signs political candidates may place on the campus. 123 (e)âProhibit the use of institution-issued e-mails for use 124 by political campaigns, political messaging, and all other forms 125 of communication by candidates for public office, current 126 elected officials, campaign managers, members of their staff, 127 volunteers for political campaigns, or any other political 128 entity. An institutionâs e-mail is the property of the 129 institution and funded with taxpayersâ dollars. The use of such 130 e-mail for political gain on behalf of a candidate for office or 131 a campaign constitutes fraud and is subject to state and federal 132 law. 133 (f)âProhibit the use of institution property, including 134 classrooms, lecture halls, offices, electronic and nonelectronic 135 signage, golf carts, and furniture, whether borrowed, leased, or 136 rented, for political campaigns, voter registration drives, 137 transporting voters to voting locations, and all other political 138 activities by candidates for public office, elected officials, 139 political committees, partisan political campaigns and their 140 staff, or any other political entity. 141 (g)âAllow the distribution of flyers freely, spontaneously, 142 and contemporaneously without individuals needing prior approval 143 if such distribution takes place in an outdoor area. An 144 institution may enforce reasonable restrictions on the time, 145 place, and manner of distribution of such flyers if they are to 146 be distributed indoors. Such restrictions must be content 147 neutral and narrowly tailored to a significant institutional 148 interest. 149 (h)âProhibit the use of the institutionâs logos, broadcast 150 or print media, websites, social media platforms, university 151 press publications, university journals, pamphlets, and all 152 other forms of communication by candidates for public office, 153 elected officials, political committees, political parties, or a 154 political partyâs campaign manager, staff, or volunteers for the 155 purpose of debates, voter registration drives, voting location 156 transportation, candidate meet and greets, or any other 157 political activity unless equal access and time is given to each 158 candidate for public office, elected official, political 159 committee, or political party simultaneously. Publishing or 160 transmitting, by any of the above communication methods, 161 coverage of a candidate for public office or an elected official 162 for a nonpolitical purpose shall include a disclaimer that the 163 media coverage is the personal opinion of the writer and does 164 not constitute an official endorsement or support for such 165 candidate or official by the institution. 166 (i)âMay allow political events such as lectures, debates, 167 and conversations to be held by the institution during the 168 election cycle. Such events must be conducted through an 169 institutionâs office of public policy or other designated 170 department, must follow state and federal law to conduct 171 nonpartisan activities, and include all qualified candidates for 172 specific public offices. If not all candidates are available, 173 the institution must provide equal access to other candidates at 174 an alternative time, without which the event may not be held. 175 (j)âProvide a mechanism for oversight of voter registration 176 drives, debates, meet and greets, and any other political 177 events. The policy must provide a process for the institution to 178 make available to the student population all such voter 179 registration drives, debates, meet and greets, and any other 180 political events to ensure full nonpartisan conversations, 181 engagement, and compliance with state and federal law. 182 (k)âProvide annual training to the institutionâs 183 administration, faculty, and staff regarding this section and 184 state and federal laws relating to the activities listed in this 185 section. 186 (3)âIf a student organization for one of the two major 187 political parties is organized at a public institution of higher 188 education, then the other major political party must be 189 organized on equal terms. The institution shall approve a staff 190 member to sponsor each organization or designate two students to 191 cosponsor the organization. 192 (4)âAn employee of a public institution of higher 193 education, including, but not limited to, an administrator, a 194 faculty member, and a staff member, who files as a candidate for 195 any federal, state, or municipal elected office may not use e 196 mail, offices, or time during working hours for campaign-related 197 activities, including campaigning, displaying campaign materials 198 on campus, or using institution property, equipment, or 199 communications to solicit political support or to campaign or 200 use his or her position of power or state media platforms for 201 political advancement on campus. An institution employeeâs 202 participation in the political process is limited only when he 203 or she is performing his or her professional duties as an 204 employee of the institution. This subsection does not apply to 205 the rights of an institutionâs employee who is engaging in 206 political activities during his or her personal time, unless 207 such activities take place on campus. 208 (5)(a)âThis section does not apply to a county supervisor 209 of elections who uses a public institution of higher educationâs 210 campus facilities as a polling place during any scheduled or 211 special election cycle. 212 (b)âThis section does not apply to a student residing on 213 campus. He or she may post signage in his or her personal rented 214 rooms and spaces. 215 (c)âThis section may not be construed to infringe on any 216 rights under s. 1004.097. 217 (6)âThe State Board of Education and the Board of Governors 218 shall monitor compliance with this section and state and federal 219 law with an emphasis on equal access to both major political 220 parties and any other minor parties relating to elections, 221 campaigns, voter registrations, and voter transportation drives. 222 (7)âFollowing each election cycle, each public institution 223 of higher education shall provide a report of its campaign 224 activities, including confirming that no political activities 225 took place on the institutionâs campuses, to the Department of 226 State, the State Board of Education, or the Board of Governors, 227 as appropriate, and its county supervisor of elections to 228 provide proof of compliance with this section and state and 229 federal law. 230 (8)âThe State Board of Education and the Board of Governors 231 shall adopt rules and regulations, respectively, to administer 232 this section. 233 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.